src/morphology/stems/particles.lexc
!!  !!!Particles
!!  The particles are all words that do not inflect at all. For compatibility
!!  reasons subsets of particles have been set off to classes like conjunctions,
!!  adverbs, adpositions, and interjections. The ones that are *not* in those classes are left here as
!!  particles.

LEXICON  PCLE_AIKANSA

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_ALLE

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_HAH

:  PCLE_COMPOUND_INTERJ  ;
:  #  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_HYVILLÄÄN

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_IKINÄ

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_ILKOSILLAAN

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_ISTUALLEEN

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_JO

:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_KO  ;
:  #  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_JONNE

:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_KA  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_KOTONA

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_KUHUN

:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_KA_S  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_LEVÄLLEEN

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_LISÄKSI

:e  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

:i  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_MITEN

:  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
:  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_KA_S  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_NOPEASTI

:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_NÄHDEN

:den  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

:te  PCLE_FRONT_POSS  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_NÄKYVIIN

:n  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI

:  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_TYKÖ

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_VAAN

:  #  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_VALTAAN

:n  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_VUOKSI

:e  PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

:i  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON  PCLE_YLIPÄÄNSÄ

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS  ;

LEXICON  PCLE_YLLE

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

LEXICON  PARTICLE
aikana+Pcle:aikana  PCLE_KOTONA  ;
ainian+Pcle:ainian  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
à% la+Pcle:à% la  PCLE_VAAN  ;
alatuuleen+Pcle:alatuuleen  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
alimmas+Pcle:alimmas  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
alumpana+Pcle:alumpana  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
ansiosta+Pcle:ansiosta  PCLE_KOTONA  ;
arvatenkin+Pcle:arvatenkin  PCLE_VAAN  ;
edemmä+Pcle:edemmä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
ees+Pcle:ees  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ehdoin+Pcle:ehdoin  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
eioo+Pcle:eioo  PCLE_VAAN  ;
elleivät+Pcle+CS:elleivät  PCLE_VAAN  ;
enemmälti+Pcle:enemmälti  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
ennenkuin+Pcle+CS:ennenkuin  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ensi+Pcle+A:ensi  PCLE_VAAN  ;
entisensä+Pcle:entisensä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
entuudestaan+Pcle:entuudesta  PCLE_ILKOSILLAAN  ;
eri+Pcle+A:eri  PCLE_VAAN  ;
erityisen+Pcle:erityise  PCLE_NÄKYVIIN  ;
eteläpuolitse+Pcle:eteläpuolitse  PCLE_ALLE  ;
etemmäksi+Pcle:etemmäksi  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
etten+Pcle+CS:etten  PCLE_VAAN  ;
etukautta+Pcle:etukautta  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
etupuolitse+Pcle:etupuolitse  PCLE_ALLE  ;
etäämmäs+Pcle:etäämmäs  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
fifty-fifty+Pcle:fifty-fifty  PCLE_VAAN  ;
haarallaan+Pcle:haarallaan  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
harvakseen+Pcle:harvakse  PCLE_ISTUALLEEN  ;
harvempaan+Pcle:harvempaan  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
heikun+Pcle:heikun  PCLE_VAAN  ;
henkihieverissä+Pcle:henkihieverissä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
hiljakseen+Pcle:hiljakse  PCLE_ISTUALLEEN  ;
hiljalleen+Pcle:hiljalle  PCLE_ISTUALLEEN  ;
hippasilla+Pcle:hippasilla  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
honoris% causa+Pcle:honoris% causa    PCLE_VAAN  ;
hunningolle+Pcle:hunningolle  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
huvikseen+Pcle:huvikse  PCLE_ISTUALLEEN  ;
hyvänen+Pcle:hyvänen  PCLE_VAAN  ;
höllälle+Pcle:höllälle  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
ihanko+Pcle:ihanko  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ihan+Pcle:ihan  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
ikipäivinä+Pcle:ikipäivinä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
iso-+Pcle:iso  PCLE_VAAN  ;
itsekseen+Pcle:itsekseen  PCLE_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
itäpuolitse+Pcle:itäpuolitse  PCLE_ALLE  ;
jalan+Pcle:jalan  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
ja/tai+Pcle+CC:ja/tai  PCLE_VAAN  ;
jolloin+Pcle:jolloin  PCLE_JONNE  ;
joltinenkin+Pcle:joltinenkin  PCLE_VAAN  ;
jonne+Pcle:jonne  PCLE_JONNE  ;
jo+Pcle:jo  PCLE_JO  ;
joskin+Pcle+CC:joskin  PCLE_VAAN  ;
jotakuinkin+Pcle:jotakuinkin  PCLE_VAAN  ;
jotenkuten+Pcle:jotenkuten  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
just+Pcle:just  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
juurijajuuri+Pcle:juurijajuur  PCLE_VUOKSI  ;
jäljekkäin+Pcle:jäljekkäin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
järjesteillä+Pcle:järjesteillä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
kahden+Pcle:kahden  PCLE_VAAN  ;
kaiketi+Pcle:kaiket  PCLE_VUOKSI  ;
kaikkialta+Pcle:kaikkialta  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
kai+Pcle:kai  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ka+Pcle:ka  PCLE_VAAN  ;
karttusilla+Pcle:karttusilla  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
kato+Pcle:kato  PCLE_VAAN  ;
kauempaa+Pcle:kauempaa  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
keralle+Pcle:keralle  PCLE_ALLE  ;
kerrakseen+Pcle:kerrakseen  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
kerta+Pcle:kerta  PCLE_VAAN  ;
kesemmällä+Pcle:kesemmällä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
keskenään+Pcle:keskenä  PCLE_HYVILLÄÄN  ;
keskitse+Pcle:keskitse  PCLE_YLLE  ;
kesäteloilta+Pcle:kesäteloilta  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
keväisin+Pcle:keväisin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
kiikkiin+Pcle:kiikkiin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
kipin+Pcle:kipin  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
kohtsiltään+Pcle:kohtsiltään  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
konsa+Pcle+CS:konsa  PCLE_VAAN  ;
korkealle+Pcle:korkealle  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
korkeintaan+Pcle:korkeintaa  PCLE_VALTAAN  ;
kuhun+Pcle:kuhun  PCLE_KUHUN  ;
kuinka+Pcle:kuinka  PCLE_KUHUN  ;
kukku+Pcle:kukku  PCLE_VAAN  ;
kulloinkin+Pcle:kulloinkin  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
kunne+Pcle:kunne  PCLE_KUHUN  ;
kunnon+Pcle:kunnon  PCLE_VAAN  ;
kussa+Pcle:kussa  PCLE_KUHUN  ;
kuti+Pcle:kut  PCLE_VUOKSI  ;
kuulemma+Pcle:kuulemma  PCLE_VAAN  ;
kuurupiilosilla+Pcle:kuurupiilosilla  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
kyykystä+Pcle:kyykystä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
käsissä+Pcle:käsissä  PCLE_IKINÄ  ;
köyrystä+Pcle:köyrystä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
laa+Pcle:laa  PCLE_VAAN  ;
likemmin+Pcle:likemmin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
likimaille+Pcle:likimaille  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
litistyksiin+Pcle:litistyksiin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
lopen+Pcle:lopen  PCLE_VAAN  ;
lujalle+Pcle:lujalle  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
lukuunottamatta+Pcle:lukuunottamatta  PCLE_KOTONA  ;
lähimmäs+Pcle:lähimmäs  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
maanteitse+Pcle:maanteitse  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
maitse+Pcle:maitse  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
mar+Pcle:mar  PCLE_VAAN  ;
mihinpäin+Pcle:mihinpäin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
miksi+Pcle:miksi  PCLE_MITEN  ;
minunlaiseni+Pcle:minunlaiseni  PCLE_VAAN  ;
mites+Pcle:mites  PCLE_VAAN  ;
murhemielin+Pcle:murhemielin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
mutku+Pcle:mutku  PCLE_VAAN  ;
mutta+Pcle+CC:mutta  PCLE_KOTONA  ;
muuanne+Pcle:muuanne  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
myötäänsä+Pcle:myötäänsä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
niinikään+Pcle:niinikää  PCLE_NÄKYVIIN  ;
niinku+Pcle:niinku  PCLE_VAAN  ;
nipinnapin+Pcle:nipinnapi  PCLE_VALTAAN  ;
noin% päin+Pcle:noin% päin    PCLE_VAAN  ;
nurkikkain+Pcle:nurkikkain  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
nykyjään+Pcle:nykyjään  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
näinollen+Pcle:näinolle  PCLE_VALTAAN  ;
näkösällä+Pcle:näkösällä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
näämmä+Pcle:näämmä  PCLE_VAAN  ;
oikeestaan+Pcle:oikeestaa  PCLE_VALTAAN  ;
oikoisenaan+Pcle:oikoisena  PCLE_ILKOSILLAAN  ;
osaksi+Pcle:osaksi  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
pallosille+Pcle:pallosille  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
pelkästään+Pcle:pelkästää  PCLE_NÄKYVIIN  ;
peremmäs+Pcle:peremmäs  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
peräti+Pcle:peräti  PCLE_VAAN  ;
pikimmiten+Pcle:pikimmiten  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
pilalla+Pcle:pilalla  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
piruuttaan+Pcle:piruutta  PCLE_ILKOSILLAAN  ;
pohjoisempana+Pcle:pohjoisempana  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
puolihereillä+Pcle:puolihereillä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
puolisalaa+Pcle:puolisalaa  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
puolitiehen+Pcle:puolitiehen  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
puolitse+Pcle:puolitse  PCLE_ALLE  ;
päihdyksiin+Pcle:päihdyksiin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
päällekkäin+Pcle:päällekkäin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
raivoihinsa+Pcle:raivoihinsa  PCLE_AIKANSA  ;
rannemmalla+Pcle:rannemmalla  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
retuperällä+Pcle:retuperällä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
reunimpana+Pcle:reunimpana  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
saatikka+Pcle+CC:saatikka  PCLE_VAAN  ;
samalla+Pcle:samalla  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
seinätyksin+Pcle:seinätyksin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
sensijaan+Pcle:sensijaa  PCLE_VALTAAN  ;
sentakia+Pcle:sentakia  PCLE_VAAN  ;
sikkaraan+Pcle:sikkaraan  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
sikseen+Pcle:sikseen  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
sinnempänä+Pcle:sinnempänä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
sisimmällä+Pcle:sisimmällä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
sittenkään+Pcle:sittenkään  PCLE_VAAN  ;
sivulla+Pcle:sivulla  PCLE_KOTONA  ;
sojossa+Pcle:sojossa  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
sopimusteitse+Pcle:sopimusteitse  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
sumeilematta+Pcle:sumeilematta  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
surku+Pcle:surku  PCLE_VAAN  ;
sylikkäin+Pcle:sylikkäin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
syntyjään+Pcle:syntyjä  PCLE_HYVILLÄÄN  ;
syrjäsilmällä+Pcle:syrjäsilmällä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
syvässä+Pcle:syvässä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
taemma+Pcle:taemma  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
takapuolitse+Pcle:takapuolitse  PCLE_ALLE  ;
takaviistosta+Pcle:takaviistosta  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
tasan+Pcle:tasan  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
tekeillä+Pcle:tekeillä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
ties+Pcle:ties  PCLE_VAAN  ;
todella+Pcle:todella  PCLE_KOTONA  ;
toisaalla+Pcle:toisaalla  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
toisinsanoen+Pcle:toisinsanoe  PCLE_VALTAAN  ;
tota+Pcle:tota  PCLE_KOTONA  ;
tuhkatiheään+Pcle:tuhkatiheään  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
tukkeuksissa+Pcle:tukkeuksissa  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
tuotanoin+Pcle:tuotanoin  PCLE_VAAN  ;
tuuperruksista+Pcle:tuuperruksista  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
tällään+Pcle:tällään  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
täpötäyteen+Pcle:täpötäyteen  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
upsista+Pcle:upsista  PCLE_VAAN  ;
uudelleen+Pcle:uudelleen  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
vaikka+Pcle+CC:vaikka  PCLE_KOTONA  ;
vaikka+Pcle+CS:vaikka  PCLE_KOTONA  ;
vaikka+Pcle:vaikka  PCLE_KOTONA  ;
vaikket+Pcle+CS:vaikket  PCLE_VAAN  ;
valtoimenaan+Pcle:valtoimena  PCLE_ILKOSILLAAN  ;
varsin+Pcle:varsin  PCLE_VAAN  ;
vasemmalle+Pcle:vasemmalle  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
veks+Pcle:veks  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
vihdoin+Pcle:vihdoi  PCLE_VALTAAN  ;
virtanaan+Pcle:virtanaan  PCLE_NOPEASTI  ;
von+Pcle:von  PCLE_VAAN  ;
vähissä+Pcle:vähissä  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
yksikseen+Pcle:yksikseen  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
ylipäänsä+Pcle:ylipäänsä  PCLE_YLIPÄÄNSÄ  ;
ylipäätään+Pcle:ylipäätä  PCLE_HYVILLÄÄN  ;
ynnä+Pcle+CC:ynnä  PCLE_IKINÄ  ;
äkimmin+Pcle:äkimmin  PCLE_TYHMÄSTI  ;
öky+Pcle:öky  PCLE_VAAN  ;
